District of Columbia statutes.
26-1152.21

Filing requirements.

(a)

Within 14 days following the funding of a covered loan, a lender otherwise subject to the jurisdiction of the Mayor shall submit to the Mayor a loan package including copies of the following documents:

(1)

The settlement statement;

(2)

The FP-7 Form filed with the Recorder of Deeds;

(3)

The final Truth in Lending Act disclosure; and

(4)

The note.

(b)

In its transmittal of the loan package required by subsection (a) of this section, the lender shall certify that each of the documents provided are true copies of the original documents.

(c)

The loan package submitted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section shall remain confidential and exempt from disclosure under any law except to the borrower, a lender involved in the covered loan transaction, or current noteholder.

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 221, 49 DCR 2551
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 221 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).